Hawaii, session 2025, HB1380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that trees are essential for improving soil health and building climate resiliency.  Trees absorb carbon dioxide and supply oxygen, lower air temperatures, provide shade and shelter, stabilize soil, prevent soil erosion, support the capture and conservation of the State's water supply, help remediate pollutants, and cut down on noise pollution by acting as sound barriers. The legislature further finds that the standards and best practices of the tree care industry not only reflect the knowledge of specialists in the field and the latest in research findings, but also raise the level of professionalism and public confidence in the field of tree care.  Certified arborists, or professional individuals who are equipped to plant, prune, transplant, fertilize, monitor and treat for insects and diseases, and remove trees and other woody plants, have an obligation to perform work that meets these industry standards and best practices.  The legislature notes that the State has a duty to manage and administer its public lands, including the soil conservation function and all activities on and within the forests, forest reserves, and state parks, and to promote the conservation, development, and utilization of forests, including forest reserves. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the State to ensure that all certified arborists in its employ or under contract adhere to best management practices. SECTION 2. The State and its departments, offices, agencies, and political subdivisions shall require and enforce all certified arborists in its employ, including contractors, to adhere to best management practices in tree management and arboriculture-related care. For the purposes of this section, "best management practices" means the American National Standards Institute A300 Tree Care standards. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________